Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB429.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 438.305 TO 438.350 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) A retailer shall notify a consumer placing an order for any tobacco
products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products that the shipment
or delivery shall not be completed unless the recipient of the shipment or
delivery provides a valid identification document at the time of the shipment
or delivery verifying that the recipient is at least twenty-one (21) years of
age.
(b) All tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product
containers shipped or delivered to a consumer shall be conspicuously
labeled with the words: "CONTAINS TOBACCO PRODUCTS:
SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR
DELIVERY", "CONTAINS ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PRODUCTS:
SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR
DELIVERY", or "CONTAINS VAPOR PRODUCTS: SIGNATURE OF
PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY", as
appropriate for each shipment or delivery.
(2) At the time of delivery, the recipient of the shipment or delivery shall present to
the individual delivering the package a valid identification document. Prior to
transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the package
shall visually inspect the document and verify the identity of the recipient and, by
visual examination or by using age verification technology, that the recipient is at
least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(3) Before transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the
package shall obtain the signature of the recipient of the shipment or delivery.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 6:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1062
The individual who receives and signs for the tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products is not required to be the consumer who
purchased the tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.
(4) A retailer or common or private carrier that fails to comply with this section
shall:
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of five
hundred dollars ($500); and
(b) For each subsequent offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of
one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(5) A consumer who intentionally causes an unlawful shipment or delivery under
this section shall:
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of two
hundred fifty dollars ($250); and
(b) For each subsequent offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of
five hundred dollars ($500).
The retailer and the common or private carrier shall not be liable for a violation
of this subsection.
(6) If a common or private carrier is unable to complete delivery under this section,
the tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products shall be
returned to the retailer.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 6:39 PM Jacketed